en: Copystands
xx: Copystands
cs: Stojany na zvětšovací přístroje
da: Standere til kopiering
de: Reprostative
es: Mesa de reproducción
fr: Statifs
it: Stativi per riproduzioni
ja: コピースタンド
nl: Copystands
no: Kopieringsstativer
pl: Statywy do reprodukcji
pt: Suporte fixo para fotografia
ru: Столы для сканирования
sv: Kopieringsstativ
tr: Kopya Stantları

en: Darkroom Sinks
xx: Darkroom Sinks
cs: Výlevky do temné komory
da: Vaske til mørkekammer
de: Dunkelkammerbecken
es: Pilas para revelado
fr: Bacs de chambre noire
it: Lavelli per camera oscura
ja: 暗室用シンク
nl: Gootstenen voor donkere kamers
no: Mørkeromskar
pl: Zlewy do ciemni
pt: Bacias de quarto escuro
ru: Раковины для фотолабораторий
sv: Mörkrumsdiskbänkar
tr: Karanlık Oda Küvetleri

en: Developing Tanks & Reels
xx: Developing Tanks & Reels
cs: Vývojnice
da: Filmfremkaldelsesbeholdere og -spoler
de: Entwicklungstanks & -spiralen
es: Carretes y tanques para revelado
fr: Cuves et bobines de développement
it: Vasche e bobine per sviluppo
ja: 現像タンク・リール
nl: Ontwikkeltanks en -spoelen
no: Fremkallingstanker og spoler
pl: Koreksy i szpule
pt: Tanques e carretéis de revelação
ru: Проявочные бачки и катушки
sv: Framkallningsbehållare och rullar
tr: Banyo Tank ve Makaraları

en: Print Trays\, Washers & Dryers
xx: Print Trays\, Washers & Dryers
cs: Misky\, pračky a sušičky
da: Tryk – fade\, skylleapparater\, tørreapparater
de: Entwicklungsschalen\, Wascher & Trockner
es: Secadores\, pilas y bandejas de revelado
fr: Cuves de révélation\, de lavage et de séchage
it: Vassoi/vasche lavaggio stampe/essiccatori
ja: 写真現像用トレイ
nl: Bakjes\, wassers en drogers
no: Bildebrett\, vaskere og tørkere
pl: Kuwety\, kuwety do płukania\, kuwety do suszenia
pt: Bandejas\, lavagem e secagem de impressão
ru: Лотки\, мойки и сушилки для печати фотографий
sv: Behållare för förstoringar\, tvätt- och torkutrustning
tr: Baskı Tepsileri\, Yıkama ve Kurutma Makineleri

en: Retouching Equipment & Supplies
xx: Retouching Equipment & Supplies
cs: Retušovací vybavení a potřeby
da: Retoucheringsudstyr og forbrugsvarer
de: Retuschierbedarf & -zubehör
es: Material y equipo de retoques
fr: Matériel et accessoires de retouche
it: Strumenti e prodotti per ritocchi
ja: レタッチ用品
nl: Apparatuur en benodigdheden voor retoucheren
no: Retusjeringsutstyr og -materiell
pl: Sprzęt i środki do retuszu
pt: Equipamentos e suprimentos de retoque
ru: Оборудование и материалы для ретуширования
sv: Utrustning och material för retuschering
tr: Rötuş Ekipman ve Sarf Malzemeleri

en: Enlarging Equipment
xx: Enlarging Equipment
cs: Zvětšovací vybavení
da: Forstørrelsesudstyr
de: Vergrößerungszubehör
es: Equipo de ampliación
fr: Matériel d'agrandissement
it: Strumenti di ingrandimento
ja: 引き伸ばし機材
nl: Vergrotingsapparatuur
no: Forstørrelsesutstyr
pl: Sprzęt do powiększania
pt: Equipamento de ampliação
ru: Увеличительное оборудование
sv: Förstoringsutrustning
tr: Agrandisör Ekipmanları

en: Darkroom Easels
xx: Darkroom Easels
cs: Maskovací rámy
da: Mørkekammer – klapramme
de: Dunkelkammerstaffeleien
es: Marginadores
fr: Margeurs
it: Marginatori camera oscura
ja: イーゼルマスク
nl: Ezels voor donkere kamers
no: Mørkeromstaffelier
pl: Ramki do powiększalnika
pt: Cavaletes de quarto escuro
ru: Столики фотоувеличителя
sv: Avmaskningsramar
tr: Karanlık Oda Sehpaları

en: Darkroom Timers
xx: Darkroom Timers
cs: Časovače pro temné komory
da: Mørkekammer – ure
de: Dunkelkammer-Timer
es: Temporizadores del cuarto oscuro
fr: Compte-poses
it: Timer per camera oscura
ja: 暗室時計
nl: Timers voor donkere kamers
no: Mørkeromtimere
pl: Zegary ciemniowe
pt: Cronômetro de quarto escuro
ru: Таймеры для фотолабораторий
sv: Exponeringsur
tr: Karanlık Oda Zamanlayıcıları

en: Focusing Aids
xx: Focusing Aids
cs: Lupy na ostření
da: Fokuseringshjælpemidler
de: Fokussierhilfen
es: Herramientas de enfoque
fr: Auxiliaires de mise au point
it: Supporti messa a fuoco
ja: フォーカススコープ
nl: Hulpmiddelen voor scherpstellen
no: Fokuseringshjelpemidler
pl: Lupy
pt: Lupas de focalização
ru: Фокусирующие устройства
sv: Fokuseringshjälpmedel
tr: Odaklama Destekleri

en: Photographic Analyzers
xx: Photographic Analyzers
cs: Analyzátory a expozimetry
da: Fotografisk analyse
de: Lichtmesser
es: Analizadores fotográficos
fr: Analyseurs et posemètres
it: Analizzatori ed esposimetri
ja: フォトアナライザー
nl: Analysatoren en belichtingsmeters
no: Fotoanalyseapparater
pl: Analizatory ciemniowe
pt: Analisadores e fotômetros
ru: Анализаторы и экспонометры
sv: Exponeringsmätare
tr: Fotoğraf Analiz Cihazları

en: Photographic Enlargers
xx: Photographic Enlargers
cs: Zvětšovací přístroje
da: Fotografisk forstørrelse
de: Fotovergrößerer
es: Ampliadoras fotográficas
fr: Agrandisseurs de photos
it: Ingranditori di foto
ja: 写真引き伸ばし機
nl: Fotovergrotingsapparaten
no: Fotoforstørrere
pl: Powiększalniki fotograficzne
pt: Ampliadores fográficos
ru: Фотоувеличители
sv: Förstoringsapparater
tr: Agrandisörler

en: Photographic Chemicals
xx: Photographic Chemicals
cs: Fotografické chemikálie
da: Foto – kemikalier
de: Fotochemikalien
es: Productos químicos para fotografía
fr: Produits chimiques pour la photographie
it: Prodotti chimici per foto
ja: 写真現像薬剤
nl: Fotochemicaliën
no: Fotografiske kjemikalier
pl: Chemikalia fotograficzne
pt: Produtos químicos fotográficos
ru: Химические реагенты для фотографий
sv: Fotokemikalier
tr: Fotoğraf Kimyasalları

en: Photographic Paper
xx: Photographic Paper
cs: Fotografické papíry
da: Fotopapir
de: Fotopapier
es: Papel fotográfico
fr: Papier photographique
it: Carta fotografica
ja: 印画紙
nl: Fotografisch papier
no: Fotopapir
pl: Papier fotograficzny
pt: Papel fotográfico
ru: Фотобумага
sv: Fotopapper
tr: Fotoğraf Kağıdı

en: Safelights
xx: Safelights
cs: Červené osvětlení
da: Mørkekammerlamper
de: Dunkelkammerleuchten
es: Luces de seguridad
fr: Lampes inactiniques
it: Illuminazione di sicurezza
ja: セーフライト
nl: Waarschuwingslampjes
no: Mørkeromsbelysning
pl: Lampy ciemniowe
pt: Luzes de segurança para revelação
ru: Фотолабораторные фонари
sv: Mörkrumslampor
tr: Karanlık Oda Işıkları

en: Lighting & Studio
xx: Lighting & Studio
cs: Osvětlení a studiové vybavení
da: Lyssætning og studieoptagelser
de: Beleuchtung & Studiobedarf
es: Iluminación y estudio
fr: Éclairage et studio
it: Illuminazione e studio
ja: 照明・スタジオ
nl: Belichting en studio
no: Belysning og studio
pl: Oświetlenie i studio
pt: Iluminação e estúdio
ru: Освещение и оборудование для студий
sv: Ljussättning och studio
tr: Işıklandırma ve Stüdyo

en: Light Meter Accessories
xx: Light Meter Accessories
cs: Expozimetry – příslušenství
da: Lysmåler – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Belichtungsmesser
es: Accesorios para fotómetros
fr: Accessoires de posemètres
it: Accessori esposimetri
ja: 露出計アクセサリー
nl: Accessoires voor lichtmeter
no: Tilbehør til lysmåler
pl: Akcesoria do światłomierzy
pt: Acessórios para medidor de luz
ru: Принадлежности для экспонометров
sv: Tillbehör till ljusmätare
tr: Işıkölçer Aksesuarları

en: Light Meters
xx: Light Meters
cs: Expozimetry
da: Lysmålere
de: Belichtungsmesser
es: Fotómetros
fr: Posemètres
it: Esposimetri
ja: 露出計
nl: Belichtingsmeters
no: Lysmålere
pl: Światłomierze
pt: Fotômetros
ru: Экспонометры
sv: Ljusmätare
tr: Işıkölçerler

en: Studio Backgrounds
xx: Studio Backgrounds
cs: Pozadí
da: Baggrunde
de: Studiohintergründe
es: Fondos
fr: Arrière-plans de studio
it: Sfondi da studio
ja: 背景・バックドロップ
nl: Achtergronden
no: Studiobakgrunner
pl: Tła
pt: Planos de fundo
ru: Оснащение для заднего плана
sv: Bakgrunder
tr: Fonlar

en: Studio Light & Flash Accessories
xx: Studio Light & Flash Accessories
cs: Příslušenství ke studiovému osvětlení
da: Tilbehør til studielys og studieblitz
de: Zubehör für Studiobeleuchtung & Blitzgeräte
es: Accesorios para flash e iluminación de estudio
fr: Accessoires de lampes et flashs de studio
it: Accessori per luci e flash da studio
ja: スタジオ用ライト・フラッシュ関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor studiobelichting en flitslicht
no: Tilbehør til studiolys og blitser
pl: Oświetlenie studyjne i akcesoria oświetleniowe
pt: Acessórios para flash e iluminação de estúdio
ru: Принадлежности для павильонного освещения и вспышек
sv: Tillbehör till studiolampor och -blixtar
tr: Stüdyo Işığı ve Flaşı Aksesuarları

en: Studio Lighting Controls
xx: Studio Lighting Controls
cs: Ovládání studiového osvětlení
da: Lyskontrol
de: Lichtsteuerung
es: Controles de iluminación
fr: Commandes d'éclairage de studio
it: Controlli per luci da studio
ja: 露出コントロール
nl: Verlichtingsregeling
no: Lyskontroller til studio
pl: Kontrolery oświetlenia
pt: Controles de luz
ru: Оборудование для управления освещением
sv: Ljuskontroller
tr: Işık Kumandaları